Maine, session 132, LD1271.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1002, sub-§2-C is enacted to read:
2-C. Permissive volunteer placement by school administrative unit.
Notwithstanding subsection 2-A, a school board may, but is not required to, permit a
superintendent's or school board member's spouse or other family member to serve as a
volunteer. A school board may adopt a written policy on nepotism to discourage favoritism
and political patronage, consider the needs of the school system and provide that all
volunteers have a fair and equal opportunity to be selected on merit, with priority
consideration given to the best interest of students without restrictions based solely on
family association.